Utah, session 2026, HB518.
Section 1. Section 53E-3-1002 is amended to read:53E-3-1002. Literacy coaching -- Professional learning.(1)Subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall provide, train, and assign literacy coaches to schools with low literacy achievement performance to provide early literacy coaching to teachers in kindergarten through grade 3, in accordance with this section.(2)The state board shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:(a)establish criteria to determine which schools qualify for early literacy coaching, prioritizing coaching among:(i)schools that participate in partnerships that receive grants under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program; and(ii)schools that fall within the bottom 25% of all schools in literacy achievement performance, as the state board further defines;(b)establish minimum qualifications for early literacy coach positions to ensure adequate preparation with necessary expertise;(c)define roles and responsibilities for a literacy coach, including:(i)assisting educators in analyzing data to inform instructional adjustments;(ii)engaging in instructional coaching cycles with educators to build capacity for improved classroom instructional practices;(iii)using principles of adult learning to effectively partner with educators to integrate professional learning into classroom practice;(iv)leveraging knowledge of the science of reading and evidence-based practices to support educators in maximizing student learning;(v)partnering with a school's leader to support school-wide literacy goals to provide a team of support for educators to embed the state-wide goals into instructional plans and practice;(vi)delivering consistent and frequent job-embedded professional learning;(vii)participating actively in professional learning experiences to deepen knowledge and skills for coaching; and(viii)designing and facilitating relevant and cohesive professional learning sessions to strengthen the implementation of these evidence-based practices with educators; and(ix)supporting the integration of social studies content into literacy instruction to enhance both reading comprehension and content knowledge, in alignment with the requirements of Section 53E-4-205.3;(d)establish parameters for the relationship between a literacy coach and school or LEA, including ensuring that coaches do not engage in activities or duties unrelated to literacy coaching, including:(i)serving as an evaluator, substitute teacher, clerical aid, recess or lunch aid, behavioral therapist, tester, guidance counselor, interventionist, program manager, or contest leader; or(ii)any other assignment that frequently disrupts the coach's ability to support educators in improving instructional practice.(3)The state board shall:(a)ensure that one staff position supervises early literacy coaches statewide;(b)select the pool of candidates for literacy coaching positions and coordinate with LEAs regarding interviews, final selection, and placement; and(c)annually review coaching placements and adjust placements as necessary, based on the school's literacy achievement performance and the criteria established under Subsection (2).(4)The state board shall provide professional learning support in early literacy by:(a)facilitating professional learning opportunities to support literacy coaches statewide that includes knowledge and skill development in adult learning practices, job-embedded coaching, and family engagement;(b)providing professional learning regional consultants to:(i)support LEAs and regional education service agencies in designing, facilitating, monitoring, and adjusting professional learning in early literacy that aligns with the professional learning standards described in Section 53G-11-303; and(ii)serve a cohort of LEAs within a geographic region of the state; and(c)providing statewide professional learning to support the use of collective efficacy, including the implementation of professional learning communities and school leadership teams through 2027.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-3-1004 is amended to read:53E-3-1004. Community engagement for early literacy.(1)The state board shall:(a)partner with a private business or nonprofit organization to annually provide personal, home-use, age-appropriate printed books or digital books with accompanying electronic reading devices to students:(i)who attend:(A)a school that participates in partnerships that receive grants under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program; or(B)a Title I school, as that term is defined in Section 53F-2-523; and(ii)at a minimum, in kindergarten through grade 3; and(b)provide students a choice of language where possible.(2)The state board shall develop and promote a website that provides resources for teachers and other educational support personnel to: (a)support targeted activities and strategies for parents to support at-home reading.; and(b)integrate social studies content with literacy instruction, supporting both early literacy goals and social studies learning objectives described in Section 53E-4-205.3.(3)The state board shall contract with one or more organizations that have expertise in coordinating community resources to:(a)provide training and coaching to community, school, and parent engagement coordinators; and(b)for a school that is not participating in a partnership that receives a grant under Title 53F, Chapter 5, Part 4, Partnerships for Student Success Grant Program:(i)assess the presence of existing community school infrastructure; and(ii)provide necessary supports for parent, community, and business engagement, including services and coordination support.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53E-4-204 is amended to read:53E-4-204. Standards and graduation requirements.(1)The state board shall establish rigorous core standards for Utah public schools and graduation requirements under Section 53E-3-501 for grades 9 through 12 that:(a)are consistent with state law and federal regulations;(b)use competency-based standards and assessments;(c)include instruction that stresses general financial literacy from basic budgeting to financial investments, including bankruptcy education and a general financial literacy test-out option;(d)include graduation requirements in language arts, mathematics, and science that exceed:(i)3.0 units in language arts including up to 0.5 units emphasizing verbal communication completed in a course or a school sponsored activity;(ii)2.0 units in mathematics; and(iii)and 2.0 units in science; and(e)include a graduation requirement in social studies that is equal to or exceeds 3.5 units, including at least 1.0 unit in American constitutional government and citizenship as described in Section 53E-4-205.2;(e)include a graduation requirement in social studies that is equal to or exceeds 3.5 units, including:(i)at least 1.0 unit in American constitutional government and citizenship as described in Section 53E-4-205.2, consisting of two distinct semester courses that may not be duplicated to satisfy the requirement; and(ii)at least 1.0 unit in United States history, consisting of two distinct semester courses that may not be duplicated to satisfy the requirement; and(f)ensure up to 0.5 units of the 1.0 unit in American constitutional government and citizenship described in Subsection (1)(e)(1)(e)(i) may be earned by:(i)completing a course or a school sponsored activity emphasizing verbal communication provided that a significant portion of the course or activity is dedicated to civic education, including:(A)policy analysis;(B)governmental systems; and(C)civic engagement; or(ii)participation in the Junior Reserve Officers' Training Corps described in 10 U.S.C. Sec. 2031.(2)The state board shall establish competency-based standards and assessments for elective courses.(3)The state board shall study requiring all LEAs to issue a high school diploma to students who receive:(a)an associate's degree with at least 60 credit hours from an accredited post-secondary institution; or(b)an industry certification with at least 500 hours of instruction from a business, trade association, or other industry group in accordance with Section 53E-3-501.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53E-4-205.3 is enacted to read:53E-4-205.3. Elementary social studies education.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Elementary grades" or "elementary grade level" means kindergarten through grade 6.(b)"Integrated instruction" means teaching that purposefully connects social studies content with other subject areas.(c)"Social studies" means the integrated study of history, geography, civics, and economics as outlined in the state board's standards for social studies.(2)The board shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing standards to ensure that LEAs provide regular social studies instruction in each elementary grade level.(3)The board shall:(a)develop guidelines for integrating, where appropriate, social studies instruction with English language arts and mathematics;(b)develop and maintain a repository of social studies instructional materials and resources;(c)establish criteria for qualifying integrated instruction; and(d)develop methods to measure student progress in social studies learning.(4)An LEA shall:(a)ensure that students in elementary grades receive regular social studies instruction required in Subsection (2);(b)in accordance with Section 53G-10-304, adopt social studies curricula that meet state standards;(c)ensure all elementary students have access to appropriate social studies materials;(d)provide resources to support integrated instruction;(e)ensure that elementary teachers receive ongoing professional development in social studies instruction, including integrated instruction;(f)provide time for collaborative planning to support integrated instruction;(g)regularly assess student progress in social studies;(h)use data to inform instruction and support; and(i)report social studies instructional time and student outcomes to the state board as required.(5)An LEA shall implement all requirements of this section by July 1, 2031.(6)Upon request, the board shall report to the Education Interim Committee on implementation progress and initial outcomes.

Section 5:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.